Maryland, session 2025, HB0082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 10–491 and the part “Part XI. Miscellaneous” of Article – Economic
Development of the Annotated Code of Maryland be transferred to be Section(s) 11–1701
and the subtitle “Subtitle 17. Miscellaneous” of Article – Labor and Employment of the
Annotated Code of Maryland.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
Subtitle 17. [Miscellaneous] CYBER MARYLAND PROGRAM.
11–1701.
(a) [(1)] In this [section] SUBTITLE the following words have the meanings
indicated.
[(2)] (B) “Board” means the Cyber Maryland Board.
[(3)] (C) “Fund” means the Cyber Maryland Fund.
[(4)] (D) “Program” means the Cyber Maryland Program.
11–1702.
[(b)] (A) There is a Cyber Maryland Program in the [Corporation]
DEPARTMENT.
[(c)] (B) The purposes of the Program are to:
(1) create and execute a talent pipeline that materially reduces workforce
vacancies by July 1, 2026;
(2) serve as a one–stop shop for employers seeking to leverage cyber
workforce development programs offered by the State and its partners;
(3) inform cybersecurity training and education programs operated by
public or private entities with industry–driven needs;
(4) build the most advanced local and State information technology
workforce in the nation, which, to the maximum extent possible, reflects the racial, gender,
ethnic, and geographic diversity of the State;
(5) coordinate and accelerate cybersecurity research and innovation in the
State; and

HOUSE BILL 82 3
(6) support the efforts of the Department of Information Technology to
improve the State government’s cybersecurity posture, including State agencies, local
government units, and critical infrastructure.
[(d)] (C) The Program shall:
(1) conduct ongoing research by collaborating with the Cybersecurity
Association [of Maryland], Inc., Cybersecurity Talent Advisory Board to collect and analyze
real–time industry data to identify cybersecurity workforce needs as described in the U.S.
Chamber of Commerce Talent Pipeline Management Approach;
(2) use the results of the research described in item (1) of this subsection
to increase the effectiveness of existing State cybersecurity workforce programs for
employers in the State;
(3) facilitate partnerships for new training and education programs to
address the workforce needs identified under item (1) of this subsection;
(4) develop a statewide strategic plan for cybersecurity workforce
development, using the results of the research described in item (1) of this subsection and
with input from the Cybersecurity Association [of Maryland], Inc., Cybersecurity Talent
Advisory Board on or before December 1, 2023; [and]
(5) DEVELOP, PROMOTE, SUPPORT, AND INVEST IN TALENT
IMPROVEMENT STRATEGIES, SUCH AS STRATEGIES THAT LEVERAGE THE U.S.
CHAMBER OF COMMERCE TALENT PIPELINE MANAGEMENT APPROACH; AND
[(5)] (6) ensure that outcomes of the Program are inclusive and, to the
maximum extent practicable, reflect the racial, gender, ethnic, and geographic diversity of
the State.
11–1703.
[(e) (1)] (A) There is a Cyber Maryland Fund.
[(2)] (B) The purposes of the Fund are to:
[(i)] (1) achieve the purposes identified under [subsection (c) of
this section] § 11–1702(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE; and
[(ii)] (2) support innovative approaches to meeting cybersecurity
workforce needs.
[(3)] (C) The [Corporation] DEPARTMENT shall administer the Fund.

HOUSE BILL 82
[(4) (i)] (D) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not
subject to § 7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
[(ii)] (2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and
the Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
[(5)] (E) The Fund consists of:
[(i)] (1) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund; and
[(ii)] (2) any other money from any other source accepted for the
benefit of the Fund.
[(6)] (F) The Fund may be used only for:
[(i)] (1) administrative expenses of the Program, including hiring
staff in accordance with the State budget and hiring consultants and other professionals as
necessary to implement, maintain, and administer the Program and the Fund; and
[(ii)] (2) providing grants to elementary and secondary schools,
institutions of higher education, including community colleges, EMPLOYERS, INCLUDING
for–profit corporations, and nonprofit organizations, REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP
SPONSORS, LOCAL WORKFORCE BOARDS, INDUSTRY ASSOCIATIONS, LABOR UNIONS,
LOCAL GOVERNMENT, LOCAL OR REGIONAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ENTITIES,
AND OTHER RELEVANT PARTNER ENTITIES AT THE DEPARTMENT’S DISCRETION to
operate cybersecurity programs based on the strategic plan of the Program.
[(7)] (G) The [Corporation] DEPARTMENT shall adopt standards to
award grants under this section.
[(8) (i)] (H) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the
Fund in the same manner as other State money may be invested.
[(ii)] (2) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the
General Fund of the State.
[(9)] (I) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only in accordance
with the State budget.
[(10) For fiscal year 2025 and each year thereafter, the Governor:
(i) shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of
$99,000 for the Fund to be used for talent pipeline management; and

HOUSE BILL 82 5
(ii) may include in the annual budget bill an additional
appropriation of $250,000 for the Fund.
(11) Subject to the availability of funding, for fiscal year 2025 and each year
thereafter, $250,000 of the Fund shall be used for implementing the U.S. Chamber of
Commerce Talent Pipeline Management Approach.]
[(12)] (J) The Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an
appropriation in an amount sufficient for the Program.
11–1704.
[(f) (1)] (A) There is a Cyber Maryland Board.
[(2)] (B) The Board consists of the following members:
[(i)] (1) the Senate and House of Delegates cochairs of the Joint
Committee on Cybersecurity, Information Technology, and Biotechnology;
[(ii)] (2) the Secretary, or the Secretary’s designee;
[(iii)] (3) the Secretary of [Labor] COMMERCE, or the Secretary’s
designee;
[(iv)] (4) the Maryland Secretary of Veterans and Military
Families, or the Secretary’s designee;
[(v)] (5) the Secretary of Information Technology, or the
Secretary’s designee;
(6) THE SECRETARY OF HIGHER EDUCATION, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(7) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS, OR THE
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE;
[(vi)] (8) the Chair of the Board of Directors of the Cybersecurity
Association [of Maryland], Inc., or the Chair’s designee;
[(vii)] (9) the Chair of the Maryland Workforce Association, or the
Chair’s designee;
(10) THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER OF THE MARYLAND
TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION (TEDCO), OR THE CHIEF
EXECUTIVE OFFICER’S DESIGNEE; AND

HOUSE BILL 82
[(viii)] (11) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
[1.] (I) five members from the private sector with
cybersecurity needs;
[2.] (II) one representative from a nonprofit organization
with expertise in cybersecurity talent development;
[3.] (III) one representative from a community college;
[4.] (IV) one representative from a 4–year, public HBCU
college; and
[5.] (V) one representative from a 4–year, public college[;
and
(ix) the Chief Executive Officer, or the Chief Executive Officer’s
designee].
[(3) (i)] (C) (1) Subject to [subparagraph (ii)] PARAGRAPH (2) of
this [paragraph] SUBSECTION, the members of the Board shall elect a chair from among
the members of the Board.
[(ii)] (2) The chair may not be:
[1.] (I) a State employee; or
[2.] (II) the Chief Executive Officer OF THE MARYLAND
TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION (TEDCO).
[(4)] (D) The Board shall:
[(i)] (1) provide input regarding the development of the statewide
cybersecurity workforce development strategic plan required under [subsection (d)(4) of
this section] § 11–1702(C)(4) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
[(ii)] (2) assist the Program with stakeholder outreach and
engagement;
[(iii)] (3) help the Program explore synergies where appropriate
with cybersecurity workforce development efforts by regional and county workforce
development entities;

HOUSE BILL 82 7
[(iv)] (4) coordinate as necessary with the [Maryland] Department
of [Labor] COMMERCE and the Department; and
[(v)] (5) provide other advice and support for the Program.
[(5)] (E) A member of the Board:
[(i)] (1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Board;
but
[(ii)] (2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the
Standard State Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
[(6) The Governor may remove an appointed member of the Board for
incompetence, misconduct, or failure to perform the duties of the position.]
(F) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE BOARD
SHALL REFLECT THE RACE, GENDER, AGE, AND GEOGRAPHIC DIVERSITY OF THE
STATE.
(G) (1) THE TERM OF AN APPOINTED MEMBER OF THE BOARD IS 4 YEARS.
(2) THE TERMS OF THE APPOINTED MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS
REQUIRED BY THE TERMS PROVIDED FOR APPOINTED MEMBERS OF THE BOARD ON
OCTOBER 1, 2025.
(3) AT THE END OF A TERM, AN APPOINTED MEMBER CONTINUES TO
SERVE UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(4) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
11–1705.
[(g)] On or before December 1 each year, beginning in 2026, the Program, in
conjunction with the [Corporation] DEPARTMENT, shall submit a report on the operation
and performance of the Program to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the initial
appointed members of the Cyber Maryland Board shall expire as follows:
(1) three members in 2026;

HOUSE BILL 82
(2) two members in 2027;
(3) two members in 2028; and
(4) two members in 2029.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.